Hawaii statutes.
[§206E-9] Acquisition of real property from
a county. Notwithstanding the provision of any law or charter, any county,
by resolution of its local governing body, may, without public auction, sealed
bids, or public notice, sell, lease for a term not exceeding sixty-five years,
grant or convey to the authority any real property owned by it which the
authority certifies to be necessary for its purposes. The sale, lease, grant,
or conveyance shall be made with or without consideration and upon such terms and
conditions as may be agreed upon by the county and the authority.
Certification shall be evidenced by a formal request from the authority.
Before the sale, lease, grant, or conveyance may be made to the authority, a
public hearing shall be held by the local governing body to consider the same.
Notice of the hearing shall be published at least ten days before the date set
for the hearing in such publication and in such manner as may be designated by
such local governing body. [L 1976, c 153, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next